North Carolina, session 2025, HB368.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 20-137.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-137.1. Child restraint systems required.
(a) Every driver who is transporting one or more passengers of less than 16 years of age
shall have all such passengers properly secured in a child passenger restraint system or seat belt
which meets federal standards applicable at the time of its manufacture. For purposes of this
section, a "child passenger restraint system" means any device designed to restrain or position a
child in a motor vehicle, including a booster seat.
(a1) A child less than eight years of age and less than 80 pounds in weight 57 inches in
height shall be properly secured in a weight-appropriate height and weight appropriate child
passenger restraint system. In vehicles equipped with an active passenger-side front air bag, if
the vehicle has a rear seat, a child less than five years of age and less than 40 pounds in weight
shall be properly secured in a rear seat, unless the child restraint system is designed for use with
air bags. If system as follows:
(1) Beginning as a newborn, a child shall be properly secured in a rear-facing
child passenger restraint system with transition to a forward-facing system
according to the manufacturer's instructions related to the child's height and
weight requirements for use of the system as indicated by the federally
required label on the car seat which states those requirements.
(2) The child shall be properly secured in a child passenger restraint system in a
rear seat of a vehicle and may only be positioned in the front seat of a vehicle
if one of the following exceptions applies:
a. The vehicle does not have a rear seat. However, under no
circumstances shall a child be placed in the front seat of a vehicle that
has an active front air bag using a rear-facing child passenger restraint
system. When height and weight requirements for use of a child
passenger restraint system require the seat to be rear-facing, the seat
must be secured in a vehicle with a rear seat.
b. The vehicle is not equipped with an active passenger-side front air bag.
*H368-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. The child passenger restraint system is designed for use with front air
bags when used according to the manufacturer's instructions as
indicated by the federally required label on the car seat.
(a2) A driver may satisfy the requirements of this section by properly securing a child
passenger with a seat belt as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a1) of this section, if no seating position
equipped with a lap and shoulder belt to properly secure the
weight-appropriate child passenger restraint system is available, a child less
than eight years of age and between at least 40 and 80 pounds may be
restrained by a properly fitted lap belt only.
(2) A child who is at least eight years of age or 57 inches in height may be
restrained by a properly secured lap and shoulder belt. For purposes of this
subdivision, a lap and shoulder belt are properly secured if, when fastened, all
of the following apply:
a. The lap belt fits across the child's thighs and hips and not across the
child's abdomen.
b. The shoulder belt crosses the child's body diagonally at approximately
the mid-point of the child's shoulder and the center of the child's chest.
c. The child is able to sit with the child's back straight against the
vehicle's seat back cushion and with the child's knees bent over the
vehicle's seat edge without slouching.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 20-279.21 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-279.21. "Motor vehicle liability policy" defined.
…
(f) Every motor vehicle liability policy shall be subject to the following provisions which
need not be contained therein:
…
(5) For any uninsured or underinsured claim under a policy, if the insured and the
insurer do not agree whether the insured is legally entitled to recover
compensatory damages from the owner of an uninsured or underinsured motor
vehicle or the amount of compensatory damages, then the insured may
demand to settle these disputes by arbitration.
a. If an insured files a lawsuit against the insurer or the owner or operator
of an uninsured or underinsured vehicle seeking damages that are
subject to a claim for uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage
under the policy, the insured shall have the right to demand arbitration
only if both of the following apply:
1. The suit is filed within the time limit required by the law of the
state where the accident occurred for filing a lawsuit against
the owner or operator of the uninsured or underinsured motor
vehicle for the damages arising out of the accident.
2. The insured gives the insurer a written demand for arbitration
within 30 days after the filing of the lawsuit.
b. For underinsured motorist claims, the insured shall provide the insurer
notice of the arbitration demand within 30 days after the latest of the
following:
Page 2 House Bill 368-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
1. The date the insurer advances payment to the insured in an
amount equal to a tentative settlement between the insured and
the owner or operator of the underinsured motor vehicle.
2. The date any applicable liability bonds or policies have been
exhausted by payments of judgments or settlements.
3. The filing of a lawsuit pursuant to sub-subdivision a. of this
subdivision.
c. Unless the insured and insurer agree on a different procedure, the
following procedures shall be used for all arbitrations under this
subdivision:
1. Each party will select a competent arbitrator. The two selected
arbitrators will select a third competent and disinterested
arbitrator.
2. If the third arbitrator is not selected within 30 days, the insured
or insurer may request a judge of a court of record to name one.
The court must be in the county and state in which arbitration
is pending.
3. Each party will pay its chosen arbitrator and half of all other
expenses of arbitration. Fees to lawyers and expert witnesses
are not considered arbitration expenses and are to be paid by
the hiring party.
4. Unless the insured and insurer agree otherwise, arbitration will
occur in the county and state where the insured resides.
Arbitration will be subject to the rules of procedure and
evidence in the county and state. The arbitrators will resolve
the issues. A written decision on which two arbitrators agree is
binding on the insured and insurer.
5. Judgment upon award may be entered in any proper court.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to any
claim for uninsured motorist coverage or underinsured motorist coverage that is pending and has
not been finally adjudicated or settled as of that date.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 368-Third Edition Page 3